Arkansas, session 2025, HB1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-103(6), concerning the definition of
"public meeting" under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to
read as follows:
(6) “Public meetings” means the meetings of more than two (2)
members of any bureau, commission, or agency of the state or any political
subdivision of the state, including municipalities and counties, boards of
education, and all other boards, bureaus, commissions, or organizations in
the State of Arkansas, except grand juries, supported wholly or in part by
public funds or expending public funds;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106(a), concerning public meetings
under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all meetings,
formal or informal, special or regular, of more than two (2) members of the
*LGL115*
03/03/2025 2:26:33 PM LGL115

HB1667
governing bodies of all municipalities, counties, townships, and school
districts and all boards, bureaus, commissions, or organizations of the State
of Arkansas, except grand juries, supported wholly or in part by public funds
or expending public funds, shall be public meetings.
































03/03/2025 2:26:33 PM LGL115